Illinois, session 104th, SB2783.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-109 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-109)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-169)8    Sec. 6-109. Examination of applicants. 9    (a) The Secretary of State shall examine every applicant 10for a driver's license or permit who has not been previously 11licensed as a driver under the laws of this State or any other 12state or country, or any applicant for renewal of such 13driver's license or permit when such license or permit has 14been expired for more than one year. The Secretary of State 15shall, subject to the provisions of paragraph (c), examine 16every licensed driver at least every 8 years, and may examine 17or re-examine any other applicant or licensed driver, provided 18that during the years 1984 through 1991 those drivers issued a 19license for 3 years may be re-examined not less than every 7 20years or more than every 10 years.21    The Secretary of State shall require the testing of the 22eyesight of any driver's license or permit applicant who has 23not been previously licensed as a driver under the laws of this   SB2783- 2 -LRB104 17102 LNS 30521 b1State and shall promulgate rules and regulations to provide 2for the orderly administration of all the provisions of this 3Section.4    The Secretary of State shall include at least one test 5question that concerns the provisions of the Pedestrians with 6Disabilities Safety Act in the question pool used for the 7written portion of the driver's license examination within one 8year after July 22, 2010 (the effective date of Public Act 996-1167). 10    The Secretary of State shall include, in the question pool 11used for the written portion of the driver's license 12examination, test questions concerning safe driving in the 13presence of bicycles, of which one may be concerning the Dutch 14Reach method as described in Section 2-112. 15    The Secretary of State shall include, in the question pool 16used for the written portion of the driver's license 17examination, at least one test question concerning driver 18responsibilities when approaching a stationary emergency 19vehicle as described in Section 11-907. If an applicant gives 20an incorrect response to a test question concerning subsection 21(c) of Section 11-907, Section 11-907.5, or subsection (a-1) 22of Section 11-908, then the Secretary of State shall provide 23the applicant with information concerning those Sections. 24    (b) Except as provided for those applicants in paragraph 25(c), such examination shall include a test of the applicant's 26eyesight, his or her ability to read and understand official   SB2783- 3 -LRB104 17102 LNS 30521 b1traffic control devices, his or her knowledge of safe driving 2practices and the traffic laws of this State, and may include 3an actual demonstration of the applicant's ability to exercise 4ordinary and reasonable control of the operation of a motor 5vehicle, and such further physical and mental examination as 6the Secretary of State finds necessary to determine the 7applicant's fitness to operate a motor vehicle safely on the 8highways, except the examination of an applicant 75 years of 9age or older or, if the Secretary adopts rules under Section 37 10of the Secretary of State Act to raise the age requirement for 11actual demonstrations, the examination of an applicant who has 12attained that increased age or is older shall include an 13actual demonstration of the applicant's ability to exercise 14ordinary and reasonable control of the operation of a motor 15vehicle. All portions of written and verbal examinations under 16this Section, excepting where the English language appears on 17facsimiles of road signs, may be given in the Spanish language 18and, at the discretion of the Secretary of State, in any other 19language as well as in English upon request of the examinee. 20Deaf persons who are otherwise qualified are not prohibited 21from being issued a license, other than a commercial driver's 22license, under this Code. The examination to test an 23applicant's ability to read and understand official traffic 24control devices and knowledge of safe driving practices and 25the traffic laws of this State may be administered at a 26Secretary of State facility, remotely via the Internet, or in   SB2783- 4 -LRB104 17102 LNS 30521 b1a manner otherwise specified by the Secretary of State by 2administrative rule. 3    (c) Re-examination for those applicants who at the time of 4renewing their driver's license possess a driving record 5devoid of any convictions of traffic violations or evidence of 6committing an offense for which mandatory revocation would be 7required upon conviction pursuant to Section 6-205 at the time 8of renewal shall be in a manner prescribed by the Secretary in 9order to determine an applicant's ability to safely operate a 10motor vehicle, except that every applicant for the renewal of 11a driver's license who is 75 years of age or older or, if the 12Secretary adopts rules under Section 37 of the Secretary of 13State Act to raise the age requirement for actual 14demonstrations, every applicant for the renewal of a driver's 15license who has attained that increased age or is older must 16prove, by an actual demonstration, the applicant's ability to 17exercise reasonable care in the safe operation of a motor 18vehicle.19    (d) In the event the applicant is not ineligible under the 20provisions of Section 6-103 to receive a driver's license, the 21Secretary of State shall make provision for giving an 22examination, either in the county where the applicant resides 23or at a place adjacent thereto reasonably convenient to the 24applicant, within not more than 30 days from the date said 25application is received.26    (e) The Secretary of State may adopt rules regarding the   SB2783- 5 -LRB104 17102 LNS 30521 b1use of foreign language interpreters during the application 2and examination process. 3(Source: P.A. 103-140, eff. 6-30-23; 103-680, eff. 1-1-25; 4104-260, eff. 8-15-25.) 5    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-169)6    Sec. 6-109. Examination of applicants. 7    (a) The Secretary of State shall examine every applicant 8for a driver's license or permit who has not been previously 9licensed as a driver under the laws of this State or any other 10state or country, or any applicant for renewal of such 11driver's license or permit when such license or permit has 12been expired for more than one year. The Secretary of State 13shall, subject to the provisions of paragraph (c), examine 14every licensed driver at least every 8 years, and may examine 15or re-examine any other applicant or licensed driver, provided 16that during the years 1984 through 1991 those drivers issued a 17license for 3 years may be re-examined not less than every 7 18years or more than every 10 years.19    The Secretary of State shall require the testing of the 20eyesight of any driver's license or permit applicant who has 21not been previously licensed as a driver under the laws of this 22State and shall promulgate rules and regulations to provide 23for the orderly administration of all the provisions of this 24Section.25    The Secretary of State shall allow an applicant for a   SB2783- 6 -LRB104 17102 LNS 30521 b1renewal driver's license to obtain the vision examination from 2an ophthalmologist or optometrist. 3    The Secretary of State shall include at least one test 4question that concerns the provisions of the Pedestrians with 5Disabilities Safety Act in the question pool used for the 6written portion of the driver's license examination within one 7year after July 22, 2010 (the effective date of Public Act 896-1167). 9    The Secretary of State shall include, in the question pool 10used for the written portion of the driver's license 11examination, test questions concerning safe driving in the 12presence of bicycles, of which one may be concerning the Dutch 13Reach method as described in Section 2-112. 14    The Secretary of State shall include, in the question pool 15used for the written portion of the driver's license 16examination, at least one test question concerning driver 17responsibilities when approaching a stationary emergency 18vehicle as described in Section 11-907. If an applicant gives 19an incorrect response to a test question concerning subsection 20(c) of Section 11-907, Section 11-907.5, or subsection (a-1) 21of Section 11-908, then the Secretary of State shall provide 22the applicant with information concerning those Sections. 23    (b) Except as provided for those applicants in paragraph 24(c), such examination shall include a test of the applicant's 25eyesight, his or her ability to read and understand official 26traffic control devices, his or her knowledge of safe driving   SB2783- 7 -LRB104 17102 LNS 30521 b1practices and the traffic laws of this State, and may include 2an actual demonstration of the applicant's ability to exercise 3ordinary and reasonable control of the operation of a motor 4vehicle, and such further physical and mental examination as 5the Secretary of State finds necessary to determine the 6applicant's fitness to operate a motor vehicle safely on the 7highways, except the examination of an applicant 75 years of 8age or older or, if the Secretary adopts rules under Section 37 9of the Secretary of State Act to raise the age requirement for 10actual demonstrations, the examination of an applicant who has 11attained that increased age or is older shall include an 12actual demonstration of the applicant's ability to exercise 13ordinary and reasonable control of the operation of a motor 14vehicle. All portions of written and verbal examinations under 15this Section, excepting where the English language appears on 16facsimiles of road signs, may be given in the Spanish language 17and, at the discretion of the Secretary of State, in any other 18language as well as in English upon request of the examinee. 19Deaf persons who are otherwise qualified are not prohibited 20from being issued a license, other than a commercial driver's 21license, under this Code. The examination to test an 22applicant's ability to read and understand official traffic 23control devices and knowledge of safe driving practices and 24the traffic laws of this State may be administered at a 25Secretary of State facility, remotely via the Internet, or in 26a manner otherwise specified by the Secretary of State by   SB2783- 8 -LRB104 17102 LNS 30521 b1administrative rule. 2    (c) Re-examination for those applicants who at the time of 3renewing their driver's license possess a driving record 4devoid of any convictions of traffic violations or evidence of 5committing an offense for which mandatory revocation would be 6required upon conviction pursuant to Section 6-205 at the time 7of renewal shall be in a manner prescribed by the Secretary in 8order to determine an applicant's ability to safely operate a 9motor vehicle, except that every applicant for the renewal of 10a driver's license who is 79 years of age or older must renew 11in person, and every applicant for the renewal of a driver's 12license who is 87 years of age or older or who is 75 years of 13age or older and holds a commercial driver's license must 14prove, by an actual demonstration, the applicant's ability to 15exercise reasonable care in the safe operation of a motor 16vehicle.17    (d) In the event the applicant is not ineligible under the 18provisions of Section 6-103 to receive a driver's license, the 19Secretary of State shall make provision for giving an 20examination, either in the county where the applicant resides 21or at a place adjacent thereto reasonably convenient to the 22applicant, within not more than 30 days from the date said 23application is received.24    (e) The Secretary of State may adopt rules regarding the 25use of foreign language interpreters during the application 26and examination process.   SB2783- 9 -LRB104 17102 LNS 30521 b1(Source: P.A. 103-140, eff. 6-30-23; 103-680, eff. 1-1-25; 2104-169, eff. 7-1-26; 104-260, eff. 8-15-25; revised 9-12-25.) 3    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 4changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 5that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 6represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 7not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 8made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 9Public Act.